src-fst-phonology.xfscript.md
Definitions






Rules

VG>i2 -> VV







* *mêskanaw>i2^DIMs*
* *mêskanâ000s*

* *mêskanaw>i2hk*
* *mêskanâ000hk*

* *sôniyâw>i2^DIMs*
* *sôniyâ000s0*

* *miskotâkay>i2^DIMs*
* *miskocâkâ000s0*

* *nâpêw>i2^DIMsis*
* *nâpê0000sis*

* *iskwêw>i2^DIMsis*
* *iskwê0000sis*

* *maskosiy>i2^DIMs*
* *maskosî0000s*

* *pikiw>i2^DIMs*
* *pikî0000s*

* *maskosiy>i2hk*
* *maskosî000hk*

* *sîwâpoy>i2^DIMs*
* *sîwâpô0000s*

* *tohtôsâpoy>i2hk*
* *tohtôsâpô000hk*



* *wâwi>i2^DIMs*
* *wâwi000s*

* *ôsi>i2hk*
* *ôsi00hk*



* *atimw>i2^DIMs*
* *acimo000s*

* *mistikw>i2hk*
* *mistiko00hk*
* *sâkahikan>i2^DIMs*
* *sâkahikan0i0s*

* *maskisin>i2hk*
* *maskisin0ihk*


* *atimw*
* *atim0*

* *askihkw*
* *askihk0*

* *nit2<nînihikw*
* *ni00nînihik*


* *a>tân*
* *ê0tân*



* *nit2<astotin>i2^DIMs*
* *nic0ascocin0i0s*







* *ê^EGLOT<acimo>t*
* *êh0acimo0t*

* *ê^EGLOT<d1ay2<acimo>t*
* *êh00ay0acimo0t*

* *ê^EGLOT<d2ay3d1âh<acimo>t*
* *êh00ay0âh0acimo0t*


* *nit2<nêhiyawê>n2*
* *ni00nêhiyawâ0n*
* *kit2<kâsîhkwê>n2*
* *ki00kâsîhkwâ0n*


* *nit2<tipiska>n2*
* *ni00tipiskê0n*
* *kit2<kiskêyihta>n2*
* *ki00kiskêyihtê0n*


* *ê-<nîpin3>k*
* *ê-0nîpih0k*


* *ê-<mispon>k*
* *ê-0mispo00k*



* *wapâht4>ikâtê>w*
* *wapâhc0ikâtê0w*




* *ê-<mow2>i2ht*
* *ê-0mow0iht*
* *ê-<ayaw2>i2koyâhk*
* *ê-0ayaw0ikoyâhk*
* *kit2<kîskisw>in*
* *ki00kîskiso00n*
* *nit2<kîskisw>i2mâwa*
* *ni00kîskiso00mâwa*
* *ê-<kîskisw>i2tân*
* *ê-0kîskiso00tân*
* *ê-<kîskisw>it*
* *ê-0kîskiso00t*
* *ê-<kîskisw>i2sk*
* *ê-0kîskiso00sk*
* *ê-<kîskisw>i2koyâhk*
* *ê-0kîskiso00koyâhk*
* *nit2<kîskisw>i2kawin*
* *ni00kîskiso00kawin*
* *kîskisw>in*
* *kîskiso00n*
* *kîskisw>ii2hkan*
* *kîskisô00hkan*

* *kit2<nitonaw>in*
* *ki00nitonaw0in*
* *nit2<nitonaw>i2mâwa*
* *ni00nitonâ000mâwa*
* *ê-<nitonaw>i2tân*
* *ê-0nitonâ000tân*
* *ê-<nitonaw>it*
* *ê-0nitonaw0it*
* *ê-<nitonaw>i2sk*
* *ê-0nitonâ000sk*
* *ê-<nitonaw>i2koyâhk*
* *ê-0nitonâ000koyâhk*
* *nit2<nitonaw>i2kawin*
* *ni00nitonâ000kawin*
* *nitonaw>in*
* *nitonaw0in*
* *nitonaw>îhkan*
* *nitonaw0îhkan*


* *it3>i*
* *is0i*
* *kit2<nakat3>in*
* *ki00nakas0in*
* *nit2<nakat3>i2mâwa*
* *ni00nakat0imâwa*
* *ê-<nakat3>i2tân*
* *ê-0nakat0itân*
* *ê-<nakat3>it*
* *ê-0nakas0it*
* *ê-<nakat3>i2sk*
* *ê-0nakat0isk*
* *ê-<nakat3>i2koyâhk*
* *ê-0nakat0ikoyâhk*
* *nit2<nakat3>i2kawin*
* *ni00nakat0ikawin*
* *nakat3>in*
* *nakas0in*
* *nakat3>ii2hkan*
* *nakas0îhkan*



* *kit2<kost3>in*
* *ki00ko0s0in*
* *nit2<kost3>i2mâwa*
* *ni00kost0imâwa*
* *ê-<kost3>i2tân*
* *ê-0kost0itân*
* *ê-<kost3>it*
* *ê-0ko0s0it*
* *ê-<kost3>i2sk*
* *ê-0kost0isk*
* *ê-<kost3>i2koyâhk*
* *ê-0kost0ikoyâhk*
* *nit2<kost3>i2kawin*
* *ni00kost0ikawin*
* *kost3>in*
* *ko0s0in*
* *kost3>ii2hkan*
* *ko0s0îhkan*





* *mi4<îwat3>i2^DIMs*
* *m00îwac0i0s*

__@OUTSIDE RULES@__


* *d1ay2-<nipâw*
* *na0-0nipâw*

* *d1âh-<nipâw*
* *nâh-0nipâw*

* *d2ay3-d1âh-<nipâw*
* *na0-nâh-0nipâw*

* *d2ay3-d1âh-<ayâw*
* *0ay-0âh-0ayâw*

* *d1âh-<ayâw*
* *0âh-0ayâw*

* *d1ay2-<ayâw*
* *0ay-0ayâw*

INITIAL CHANGE



* *nipât^IC*
* *nêpât0*

* *miyo-nipât^IC*
* *mêyo-nipât0*

* *itwêt^IC*
* *êtwêt0*

* *apit^IC*
* *êpit0*

* *wayawit^IC*
* *wêyawit0*

* *îkatêhtêt^IC*
* *âkatêhtêt0*

* *nîmit^IC*
* *nâmit0*

* *0ohcît^IC*
* *wêhcît0*

* *m0ostohtêt^IC*
* *mwêstohtêt0*


* *0oyôyot^IC*
* *wêyôyot0*

* *k0ocît^IC*
* *kwêcît0*


* *îkatêhât^IC*
* *âkatêhât0*

* *00îkatêhât^IC*
* *iyîkatêhât0*

* *00êskêt^IC*
* *iyêskêt0*

* *00âcimot^IC*
* *iyâcimot0*

* *00ôhkomit^IC*
* *iyôhkomit0*



* *w3<spiton*
* *o0spiton*

* *ni<spiton*
* *ni0spiton*

* *ki<spiton*
* *ki0spiton*

* *w3<îpit*
* *w0îpit*

* *w3<ahkwan*
* *w0ahkwan*





* *ni4<ohkom*
* *n00ôhkom*

* *ni4<ohkom>i2nân>ak*
* *n00ôhkom0inân0ak*

* *ki4<ohkom*
* *k00ôhkom*

* *w3<ohkom>a*
* *00ohkom0a*


* *nit2<ospwâkan*
* *nit0ôspwâkan*

* *kit2<ospwâkan*
* *kit0ôspwâkan*

* *ot2<ospwâkan*
* *ot0ôspwâkan*

Composing the rules together






* * *
<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [../src/fst/phonology.xfscript](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-cwd/blob/main/../src/fst/phonology.xfscript)</small>
